District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.107

Repealed

Subchapter not to affect Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 306, Pub. L. 87-569, § 107
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1099h.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.9.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.107.